Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.054

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

(1) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this chapter, except that the term "unlicensed practice" shall be defined by RCW 18.83.180 rather than RCW 18.130.020.

(2) A person who holds a license under this chapter is subject to the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, at all times the license is maintained.

[ 1999 c 66 s 1; 1987 c 150 s 51.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.